Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 42
ANIMAL PROTECTION

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 1 of chapter 19, C.R.S. 1963. The provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1990, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1990, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Section

35-42-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Animal Protection Act".

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1605, § 1, effective July 1.

35-42-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the protection of companion animals and livestock is a matter of statewide concern; and that it is the policy of this state that persons responsible for the care or custody of such animals be persons fit to adequately provide for the health and well-being of such animals.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1605, § 1, effective July 1.

35-42-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Abandon" means the leaving of an animal without adequate provisions for the animal's proper care by its owner, the person responsible for the animal's care or custody, or any other person having possession of such animal.

"Accepted animal husbandry" means practices generally recognized as appropriate in the care of animals consistent with the species, breed, and type of animal.

"Animal" means any living dumb creature.

"Commissioner" means the Colorado commissioner of agriculture or his designee.

"Companion animal" means domestic dogs, domestic cats, small pet birds, and other nonlivestock species.

"Department" means the Colorado department of agriculture.

"Division" means the division of animal industry of the department of agriculture.

"Livestock" means cattle, swine, sheep, goats, and such horses, mules, asses, and other animals used in the farm or ranch production of food, fiber, or other products defined by the commissioner as agricultural products.

"Mistreat" means every act or omission which causes or unreasonably permits the continuation of unnecessary or unjustifiable pain or suffering.

"Neglect" means failure to provide food, water, protection from the elements, or other care generally considered to be normal, usual, and accepted for an animal's health and well-being consistent with the species, breed, and type of animal.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1605, § 1, effective July 1.

35-42-104. Scope of article.

Nothing in this article shall affect accepted animal husbandry practices utilized by any person in the care of companion or livestock animals, or in the extermination of undesirable pests as defined in articles 7, 10, and 43 of this title.

In case of any conflict between this article or regulations adopted pursuant to this article or section 35-43-126 and the wildlife statutes of the state, said wildlife statutes shall control.

Nothing in this article shall affect animal care otherwise authorized by law.

Nothing in this article shall affect facilities licensed under the provisions of the federal "Animal Welfare Act of 1970", 7 U.S.C. sec. 2131 et seq., as amended.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1606, § 1, effective July 1.

35-42-105. State bureau of animal protection - creation.

There is created in the department of agriculture the state bureau of animal protection, referred to in this article 42 as the "bureau". The bureau is a

type 2

entity, as defined in section 24-1-105.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1606, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3403 § 150, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-42-101 as it existed prior to 1990.

Cross references:

(1) For creation of the department of agriculture and transfer of the state bureau of animal protection to the department under the "Administrative Organization Act of 1968", see § 24-1-123.

(2) For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

35-42-106. Powers and duties of the commissioner.

The commissioner has the power to administer and enforce the provisions of this article, appoint agents and establish the qualifications of such agents, promulgate rules and regulations, enter into contracts, and implement training, procedures, and rules and regulations of recommended standards for animal control officers.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1606, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-42-102 as it existed prior to 1990.

35-42-107. Bureau personnel - appointment.

Subject to the provisions of section 13 of article XII of the state constitution, the commissioner shall appoint such animal protection agents as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this article.

The commissioner may appoint agents who are employees of the state, Colorado-based nonprofit corporations, municipal corporations, counties, cities, cities and counties, or any other local governmental entity or political subdivision of the state.

When agents who are employees of nonprofit corporations are appointed, the corporation shall furnish evidence of minimum liability insurance covering said agent in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars. The state shall not be liable for the actions of such agents. Agents of the bureau shall submit to training as specified by the commissioner.

Agents of the bureau who have completed training as specified by the commissioner are vested with the power to conduct investigations and issue summonses and complaints to enforce the provisions of part 2 of article 9 of title 18 and article 80 of this title 35 as granted peace officers pursuant to section 16-2-104, and are designated as peace officers, as described in sections 16-2.5-101 and 16-2.5-118.

The commissioner may, in his discretion, revoke the commission of any agent.

The commissioner may in his discretion determine classifications and subclassifications for commissions of agent.

Agents authorized to investigate cases involving livestock shall be employees of the division or the division of brand inspection of the department or any sheriffs when appointed and within their jurisdiction.

All commissions issued by the commissioner shall expire on the anniversary date of issuance.

A commission may, in the discretion of the commissioner, be renewed.

All commissions shall be approved by the state agricultural commission.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1606, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(4) amended, p. 1312, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(4) amended, p. 1628, § 60, effective August 6.

L. 2020:

(2) and (4) amended, (SB 20-104) ch. 154, p. 661, § 2, effective September 14.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 35-42-103 and 35-42-104 as they existed prior to 1990.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 20-104, see section 1 of chapter 154, Session Laws of Colorado 2020.

35-42-108. Care of confined animal.

Except as authorized by law, no animal shall be confined without an adequate supply of food and water. If any animal is found to be confined without adequate food or water, it shall be lawful for any officer or agent of the bureau, a peace officer within his jurisdiction, or a licensed veterinarian to, from time to time as may be necessary, enter into any and upon any area or building where such animal is confined and supply it with adequate food and water; except that such entry shall not be made into any building which is a person's residence, unless by search warrant or court order.

Such officer, agent, peace officer, or veterinarian shall not be liable in any action for such entry.

Notice of the entry and care shall be given by posting such notification at an entrance to or at a conspicuous place upon such area or building where such animal is confined.

In the case of companion animals, if such animal is not cared for by a person other than an agent or officer of the bureau or a peace officer or veterinarian within seventy-two hours of the posting of said notification, such animal shall be presumed to have been abandoned under circumstances in which the animal's life or health is endangered.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1607, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-42-105 as it existed prior to 1990.

35-42-109. Protection of animals mistreated, neglected, or abandoned.

No animal shall be mistreated or neglected to such degree or abandoned in any circumstance so that the animal's life or health is endangered.

The commissioner may take charge of, provide for, or remove from the area or building where found any companion animal found to be mistreated or neglected to such degree or abandoned in any circumstance so that the animal's life or health is endangered. The commissioner shall petition any court of competent jurisdiction for a prompt hearing to determine whether the owner, if known, is able to adequately provide for the animal and is a fit person to own the animal.

Pursuant to court order, the commissioner may take charge of, provide for, or remove from the area or building where found any livestock found to be mistreated or neglected to such degree or abandoned in any circumstance so that the animal's life or health is endangered. The commissioner shall petition any court of competent jurisdiction for a prompt hearing to determine whether the owner, if known, is able to adequately provide for the animal and is a fit person to own the animal.

The commissioner shall cause to be served upon the owner:

If the owner is known and residing within the jurisdiction wherein the animal is found, written notice at least five days prior to the hearing of the time and place of the hearing;

If the owner is known but residing out of the jurisdiction where such animal is found or if the commissioner is unable after reasonable attempts to serve the owner, written notice by any method, including posting at least five days prior to the hearing at a place provided for public notices in the jurisdiction wherein such hearing shall be held, or service of process shall be given.

If the owner is not known, the commissioner shall cause to be published, in a newspaper of general circulation in the jurisdiction wherein such animal is found, notice of the hearing, and shall further cause notice of the hearing to be posted at a place provided for public notices in the jurisdiction wherein such hearing shall be held, at least five days prior to the hearing.

Such hearing shall be held promptly after the date of the seizure of the animal.

The commissioner may, in his discretion, provide for such animal until judgment by the court.

The court may order the animal sold and the proceeds deposited in the registry of the court pending a decision.

The court may adjudge that the owner is a person able to adequately provide for such animal and a person fit to own the animal, in which case the animal shall be returned to the owner after all reasonable expenses of any food, shelter, and care provided by the commissioner have been paid; except that, if such expenses are not paid within ten days of a court order adjudging the owner a person able to adequately provide for such animal and a person fit to own the animal, the commissioner may, in his discretion and without liability, dispose of the animal by selling it at public auction, placing it for adoption in a suitable home, giving it to a suitable animal shelter, or humanely destroying it as deemed proper by the commissioner.

With respect to the sale of an animal, the proceeds shall first be applied to the costs of the sale and then to the expenses for the care and provision of the animal, and the remaining proceeds, if any, shall be paid over to the owner of the animal. If the owner of the animal cannot be found, any remaining proceeds shall be paid into the estray fund, created pursuant to section 35-41-102.

At least six days prior to disposing of the animal, the commissioner shall provide written notice to the owner at his last-known address of the time and place of the disposition of the animal.

If the owner is adjudged by the court a person unable to adequately provide for the animal or a person not fit to own the animal, then the court shall order that the animal be:

Sold by the commissioner at public auction;

Placed for adoption in a suitable home;

Given to a suitable animal shelter;

Humanely destroyed as deemed proper by the court; or

Disposed of in any other manner as deemed proper by the court.

In no case shall the person adjudged unable to adequately provide for the animal or unfit to own the animal be allowed to purchase directly or indirectly the animal at any sale.

With respect to the sale of an animal, the proceeds shall first be applied to the costs of the sale and then to the expenses for the care and provision of the animal, with the remaining proceeds, if any, being paid over to the owner of the animal. If the owner of the animal cannot be found, any remaining proceeds shall be paid into the estray fund, created pursuant to section 35-41-102.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the destruction of an animal as provided in section 35-42-110.

Any officer or agent of the bureau may lawfully interfere to prevent the perpetration of an act of mistreatment, neglect, abandonment, or cruelty, pursuant to part 2 of article 9 of title 18, C.R.S., which act occurs in his presence.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1607, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 35-42-106 and 35-42-108 as they existed prior to 1990.

35-42-110. Injured animals may be euthanized.

Any agent of the bureau or peace officer, as described in section 16-2.5-101, C.R.S., may lawfully euthanize or cause to be euthanized, as defined in section 18-9-201 (2.7), C.R.S., any animal in his or her charge when, in the judgment of such agent or peace officer, and in the opinion of a licensed veterinarian, the animal is experiencing extreme pain or suffering or is severely injured past recovery, severely disabled past recovery, or severely diseased past recovery. In the event a licensed veterinarian is not available, the animal may be euthanized if, by the written certificate of two persons, one of whom may be selected by the owner if the owner so requests, called to view the animal in the presence of the agent, the animal appears to be severely injured past recovery, severely disabled past recovery, severely diseased past recovery, or unfit for any useful purpose.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1609, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1625, § 47, effective August 6.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 726, § 6, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-42-107 as it existed prior to 1990.

35-42-111. Investigations - access - administrative subpoena.

The commissioner, upon his own motion or upon the complaint of any person, shall make any investigations necessary to ensure compliance with this article.

At any reasonable time during regular business hours, the commissioner shall have free and unimpeded access, upon consent or upon obtaining an administrative search warrant, to all buildings, yards, pens, pastures, and other areas in which any animals are kept, handled, or transported for the purpose of carrying out any provision of this article or any rule made pursuant to this article.

The commissioner shall have full authority to administer oaths and take statements, to issue administrative subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses and the production of all books, memoranda, papers, and other documents, articles, or instruments and to compel the disclosure by such witnesses of all facts known to them relative to the matters under investigation. Upon the failure or refusal of any witness to obey any subpoena, the commissioner may petition the district court, and, upon a proper showing, the court may enter an order compelling the witness to appear and testify or produce documentary evidence. Failure to obey such an order of the court shall be punishable as a contempt of court.

Complaints of record made to the commissioner and the results of his investigations may, in the discretion of the commissioner, be closed to public inspection, except as provided by court order, during the investigatory period.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1609, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-42-106 as it existed prior to 1990.

35-42-112. Enforcement.

The commissioner or his designee shall enforce the provisions of this article.

Whenever the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe a violation of any provision of this article or any rule made pursuant to this article has occurred and immediate enforcement is deemed necessary, he may issue a cease-and-desist order, which may require any person to cease violating any provision of this article or any rule made pursuant to this article. Such cease-and-desist order shall set forth the provisions alleged to have been violated, the facts alleged to have constituted the violation, and shall require that all actions causing the violation be ceased.

In the event that any person fails to comply with a cease-and-desist order within twenty-four hours, the commissioner may bring a suit for a temporary restraining order and for injunctive relief to prevent any further or continued violation of this article.

No stay of a cease-and-desist order shall be issued before a hearing thereon involving both parties.

Matters brought before a court pursuant to this section shall have preference over other matters on the court's calendar.

Whenever it appears to the commissioner upon sufficient evidence satisfactory to the commissioner that any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of this article or of any rule adopted pursuant to this article, he may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction to temporarily or permanently restrain or enjoin the act or practice in question and to enforce compliance with this article or any rule adopted pursuant to this article. In any such action, the commissioner shall not be required to plead or prove irreparable injury or the inadequacy of the remedy at law. Under no circumstances shall the court require the commissioner to post a bond.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1610, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-42-106 as it existed prior to 1990.

35-42-113. Animal protection fund - creation.

There is hereby created an animal protection fund. Any donations collected for animal protection, any net proceeds from the sale of an animal pursuant to section 18-9-202.5 (4), C.R.S., and any moneys from restitution ordered for the expenses of the department of agriculture in selling and providing for the care of and provision for an animal disposed of under the animal cruelty laws in accordance with part 2 of article 9 of title 18, C.R.S., or this article shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the moneys to the animal protection fund. The general assembly shall make annual appropriations from that fund to the department of agriculture to aid in carrying out the purposes of this article; except that no such appropriations may be made for personal services.

All interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. The moneys in the fund shall not be transferred or credited to the general fund or to any other fund except as directed by the general assembly through legislation.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1610, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 895, § 3, effective August 7.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (HB 12-1125), ch. 102, p. 346, § 4, effective September 1.

35-42-114. Local regulation.

The provisions of this article shall not be construed to limit or preempt additional regulation by any city, town, or city and county. Nothing in this article shall interfere with the authority of the department of public health and environment in the enforcement of part 7 of article 4 of title 25, C.R.S., or the department of agriculture in the enforcement of article 80 of this title.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1611, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1312, § 15, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 2804, § 575, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section by Senate Bill 94-023 and House Bill 94-1029 were harmonized.

35-42-115. Dangerous dog registry - created - cash fund.

The bureau shall establish a statewide dangerous dog registry consisting of a database of information concerning microchip types and placement by veterinarians and licensed shelters in dangerous dogs pursuant to the provisions of section 18-9-204.5 (3)(e.5), C.R.S. The commissioner may promulgate such rules as may be necessary for the implementation of this section.

A veterinarian or licensed shelter that implants a microchip pursuant to the provisions of section 18-9-204.5 (3)(e.5)(III), C.R.S., shall provide to the bureau a veterinary record of the microchip. The bureau shall maintain each veterinary record provided in a registry on a statewide database.

Each person who is ordered to identify his or her dangerous dog through microchip implantation shall pay to the bureau a nonrefundable dangerous dog microchip license fee of fifty dollars, as required in section 18-9-204.5 (3)(e.5)(IV), C.R.S. The bureau shall transmit all fees collected pursuant to this subsection (3) to the state treasurer who shall credit the same to the dangerous dog microchip licensure cash fund, referred to in this section as the "fund", which fund is hereby created. The moneys in the fund shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly to the bureau for the costs incurred in implementing this section. The state treasurer may invest any moneys in the fund not expended for the purpose of this section as provided by law. All interest and income derived from the investment and deposit of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Any unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or another fund.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p.1762, § 4, effective July 1.